Washington statutes.
RCW 19.138.240

Violations—Civil penalties—Failure to pay.

(1) A civil penalty shall be imposed by the court for each violation of this chapter in an amount not less than five hundred dollars nor more than two thousand dollars per violation.

(2) If a person fails to pay an assessment after it has become a final and unappealable order, or after the court has entered final judgment in favor of the state, the director may recover the amount assessed by action in the appropriate superior court. In the action, the validity and appropriateness of the final order imposing the penalty shall not be subject to review.

[ 2002 c 86 s 282; 1994 c 237 s 21.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.